dictionaries/tr/index.aff
FLAG num
SFX 1922 N 1
SFX 1922 0 ınasın .

SFX 1923 N 1
SFX 1923 0 ınayım .

SFX 1924 N 1
SFX 1924 0 ındık .

SFX 1925 N 1
SFX 1925 0 ındım .

SFX 1926 N 1
SFX 1926 0 ındın .

SFX 1927 N 1
SFX 1927 0 ındınız .

SFX 1928 N 1
SFX 1928 0 ındıysa .

SFX 1929 N 1
SFX 1929 0 ındıysanız .

SFX 1930 N 1
SFX 1930 0 ınınmış .

SFX 1931 N 1
SFX 1931 0 ırdır .

SFX 1932 N 1
SFX 1932 0 ırlığını .

SFX 1933 N 1
SFX 1933 0 ırlığınıza .

SFX 1934 N 1
SFX 1934 0 ıyorduysa .

SFX 1935 N 1
SFX 1935 0 ınken .

SFX 1936 N 1
SFX 1936 0 ınmışçasına .

SFX 1937 N 1
SFX 1937 0 ınmışım .

SFX 1938 N 1
SFX 1938 0 ınmışımdır .

SFX 1939 N 1
SFX 1939 0 ınmışız .

SFX 1940 N 1
SFX 1940 0 ınmışızdır .

SFX 1941 N 1
SFX 1941 0 ınmışsa .

SFX 1942 N 1
SFX 1942 0 ınmışsanız .

SFX 1943 N 1
SFX 1943 0 ınmışsın .

SFX 1944 N 1
SFX 1944 0 ınmışsınız .

SFX 1945 N 1
SFX 1945 0 ınsak .

SFX 1946 N 1
SFX 1946 0 ınsalar .

SFX 1947 N 1
SFX 1947 0 ınsalardı .

SFX 1948 N 1
SFX 1948 0 ınsam .

SFX 1949 N 1
SFX 1949 0 ınsanız .

SFX 1950 N 1
SFX 1950 0 ınsın .

SFX 1951 N 1
SFX 1951 0 ırdılar .

SFX 1952 N 1
SFX 1952 0 ırlarsak .

SFX 1953 N 1
SFX 1953 0 ırmışım .

SFX 1954 N 1
SFX 1954 0 ırmışız .

SFX 1955 N 1
SFX 1955 0 larımdandır .

SFX 1956 N 1
SFX 1956 0 lardayızdır .

SFX 1957 N 1
SFX 1957 0 larımızdansa .

SFX 1958 N 1
SFX 1958 0 ndım .

SFX 1959 N 1
SFX 1959 0 ndın .

SFX 1960 N 1
SFX 1960 0 ndınız .

SFX 1961 N 1
SFX 1961 0 ndırlar .

SFX 1962 N 1
SFX 1962 0 nımdır .

SFX 1963 N 1
SFX 1963 0 nsan .

SFX 1964 N 1
SFX 1964 0 nsanız .

SFX 1965 N 1
SFX 1965 0 nsındır .

SFX 1966 N 1
SFX 1966 0 tekilerden .

SFX 1967 N 1
SFX 1967 0 teyken .

SFX 1968 N 1
SFX 1968 0 ıyordurlar .

SFX 1969 N 1
SFX 1969 0 ıyorlarken .

SFX 1970 N 1
SFX 1970 0 ıyormuşlar .

SFX 1971 N 1
SFX 1971 0 ıyormuşsun .

SFX 1972 N 1
SFX 1972 0 ıyorsalar .

SFX 1973 N 1
SFX 1973 0 ıyorsundur .

SFX 1974 N 1
SFX 1974 0 ıyorsunuzdur .

SFX 1975 N 1
SFX 1975 0 ıyoruzdur .

SFX 1976 N 1
SFX 1976 0 eler .

SFX 1977 N 1
SFX 1977 0 'ler .

SFX 1978 N 1
SFX 1978 0 lerinizdir .

SFX 1979 N 1
SFX 1979 0 meler .

SFX 1980 N 1
SFX 1980 0 midir .

SFX 1981 N 1
SFX 1981 0 midirler .

SFX 1982 N 1
SFX 1982 0 mmiş .

SFX 1983 N 1
SFX 1983 0 msen .

SFX 1984 N 1
SFX 1984 0 msindir .

SFX 1985 N 1
SFX 1985 0 ndi .

SFX 1986 N 1
SFX 1986 0 nesin .

SFX 1987 N 1
SFX 1987 0 ninkiydi .

SFX 1988 N 1
SFX 1988 0 ninkiyle .

SFX 1989 N 1
SFX 1989 0 ninmiş .

SFX 1990 N 1
SFX 1990 0 nmiş .

SFX 1991 N 1
SFX 1991 0 ysem .

SFX 1992 N 1
SFX 1992 0 larlarıyla .

SFX 1993 N 1
SFX 1993 0 sünüz .

SFX 1994 N 1
SFX 1994 0 ydü .

SFX 1995 N 1
SFX 1995 0 ydük .

SFX 1996 N 1
SFX 1996 0 ydüler .

SFX 1997 N 1
SFX 1997 0 ydüm .

SFX 1998 N 1
SFX 1998 0 ydün .

SFX 1999 N 1
SFX 1999 0 ydünüz .

SFX 2000 N 1
SFX 2000 0 ymüş .

SFX 2001 N 1
SFX 2001 0 ünkine .

SFX 2002 N 1
SFX 2002 0 üydüm .

SFX 2003 N 1
SFX 2003 0 'ıdır .

SFX 2004 N 1
SFX 2004 0 'ım .

SFX 2005 N 1
SFX 2005 0 'ımdır .

SFX 2006 N 1
SFX 2006 0 'ına .

SFX 2007 N 1
SFX 2007 0 'ında .

SFX 2008 N 1
SFX 2008 0 'ından .

SFX 2009 N 1
SFX 2009 0 'ındır .

SFX 2010 N 1
SFX 2010 0 'ını .

SFX 2011 N 1
SFX 2011 0 'ının .

SFX 2012 N 1
SFX 2012 0 'tandır .

SFX 2013 N 1
SFX 2013 0 tanım .

SFX 2014 N 1
SFX 2014 0 tanız .

SFX 2015 N 1
SFX 2015 0 taysanız .

SFX 2016 N 1
SFX 2016 0 larındansa .

SFX 2017 N 1
SFX 2017 0 ncadır .

SFX 2018 N 1
SFX 2018 0 ncası .

SFX 2019 N 1
SFX 2019 0 ncasına .

SFX 2020 N 1
SFX 2020 0 ncasında .

SFX 2021 N 1
SFX 2021 0 ncasındaki .

SFX 2022 N 1
SFX 2022 0 ncasından .

SFX 2023 N 1
SFX 2023 0 ncasının .

SFX 2024 N 1
SFX 2024 0 ncasıyla .

SFX 2025 N 1
SFX 2025 0 ndansa .

SFX 2026 N 1
SFX 2026 0 'dakiler .

SFX 2027 N 1
SFX 2027 0 'dakilerin .

SFX 2028 N 1
SFX 2028 0 'dakilerle .

SFX 2029 N 1
SFX 2029 0 'dakine .

SFX 2030 N 1
SFX 2030 0 'dakinin .

SFX 2031 N 1
SFX 2031 0 'daydık .

SFX 2032 N 1
SFX 2032 0 'larda .

SFX 2033 N 1
SFX 2033 0 'ları .

SFX 2034 N 1
SFX 2034 0 'sından .

SFX 2035 N 1
SFX 2035 0 'sındandı .

SFX 2036 N 1
SFX 2036 0 'sının .

SFX 2037 N 1
SFX 2037 0 'sıyla .

SFX 2038 N 1
SFX 2038 0 sünler .

SFX 2039 N 1
SFX 2039 0 zmışçasına .

SFX 2040 N 1
SFX 2040 0 mıştırlar .

SFX 2041 N 1
SFX 2041 0 'indir .

SFX 2042 N 1
SFX 2042 0 'ıyla .

SFX 2043 N 1
SFX 2043 0 ımdakiler .

SFX 2044 N 1
SFX 2044 0 ımdakilere .

SFX 2045 N 1
SFX 2045 0 ımızdakiler .

SFX 2046 N 1
SFX 2046 0 ımızdalar .

SFX 2047 N 1
SFX 2047 0 ındadırlar .

SFX 2048 N 1
SFX 2048 0 ındakilerde .

SFX 2049 N 1
SFX 2049 0 ındakilerdeki .

SFX 2050 N 1
SFX 2050 0 ındakilerdeyse .

SFX 2051 N 1
SFX 2051 0 ındakilerinden .

SFX 2052 N 1
SFX 2052 0 ındakilerine .

SFX 2053 N 1
SFX 2053 0 ındakilerini .

SFX 2054 N 1
SFX 2054 0 ındakilerinse .

SFX 2055 N 1
SFX 2055 0 ındakilerse .

SFX 2056 N 1
SFX 2056 0 ındakinden .

SFX 2057 N 1
SFX 2057 0 ındakine .

SFX 2058 N 1
SFX 2058 0 ındakini .

SFX 2059 N 1
SFX 2059 0 ındakinin .

SFX 2060 N 1
SFX 2060 0 ındakiyle .

SFX 2061 N 1
SFX 2061 0 ındalardı .

SFX 2062 N 1
SFX 2062 0 ındalarmış .

SFX 2063 N 1
SFX 2063 0 ındalarsa .

SFX 2064 N 1
SFX 2064 0 ındanmış .

SFX 2065 N 1
SFX 2065 0 ındasınızdır .

SFX 2066 N 1
SFX 2066 0 ındaydın .

SFX 2067 N 1
SFX 2067 0 ındaydınız .

SFX 2068 N 1
SFX 2068 0 ındayızdır .

SFX 2069 N 1
SFX 2069 0 ındaymışçasına .

SFX 2070 N 1
SFX 2070 0 ındaymışız .

SFX 2071 N 1
SFX 2071 0 ındaymışlar .

SFX 2072 N 1
SFX 2072 0 ındaymışsın .

SFX 2073 N 1
SFX 2073 0 ındaymışsınız .

SFX 2074 N 1
SFX 2074 0 ındaysak .

SFX 2075 N 1
SFX 2075 0 ındaysan .

SFX 2076 N 1
SFX 2076 0 ındırlar .

SFX 2077 N 1
SFX 2077 0 ınızdakiler .

SFX 2078 N 1
SFX 2078 0 ınızdakilere .

SFX 2079 N 1
SFX 2079 0 ınladır .

SFX 2080 N 1
SFX 2080 0 ınsan .

SFX 2081 N 1
SFX 2081 0 suydu .

SFX 2082 N 1
SFX 2082 0 takilerce .

SFX 2083 N 1
SFX 2083 0 takilerde .

SFX 2084 N 1
SFX 2084 0 takilerinden .

SFX 2085 N 1
SFX 2085 0 takilerine .

SFX 2086 N 1
SFX 2086 0 takilerini .

SFX 2087 N 1
SFX 2087 0 takilerle .

SFX 2088 N 1
SFX 2088 0 takilerse .

SFX 2089 N 1
SFX 2089 0 takinde .

SFX 2090 N 1
SFX 2090 0 takiyle .

SFX 2091 N 1
SFX 2091 0 takiyse .

SFX 2092 N 1
SFX 2092 0 daysak .

SFX 2093 N 1
SFX 2093 0 sındanım .

SFX 2094 N 1
SFX 2094 0 mdayım .

SFX 2095 N 1
SFX 2095 0 ndadırlar .

SFX 2096 N 1
SFX 2096 0 ndakilere .

SFX 2097 N 1
SFX 2097 0 ndasınız .

SFX 2098 N 1
SFX 2098 0 ndasınızdır .

SFX 2099 N 1
SFX 2099 0 ndaydık .

SFX 2100 N 1
SFX 2100 0 ndaydılar .

SFX 2101 N 1
SFX 2101 0 ndaydım .

SFX 2102 N 1
SFX 2102 0 ndayız .

SFX 2103 N 1
SFX 2103 0 ndaysak .

SFX 2104 N 1
SFX 2104 0 ndaysanız .

SFX 2105 N 1
SFX 2105 0 yladır .

SFX 2106 N 1
SFX 2106 0 ylaydı .

SFX 2107 N 1
SFX 2107 0 ylaymış .

SFX 2108 N 1
SFX 2108 0 larlarının .

SFX 2109 N 1
SFX 2109 0 'mız .

SFX 2110 N 1
SFX 2110 0 düler .

SFX 2111 N 1
SFX 2111 0 unkinden .

SFX 2112 N 1
SFX 2112 0 nuzu .

SFX 2113 N 1
SFX 2113 0 sunda .

SFX 2114 N 1
SFX 2114 0 sundan .

SFX 2115 N 1
SFX 2115 0 ımızca .

SFX 2116 N 1
SFX 2116 0 larınınki .

SFX 2117 N 1
SFX 2117 0 mızsın .

SFX 2118 N 1
SFX 2118 0 sınındı .

SFX 2119 N 1
SFX 2119 0 eyiz .

SFX 2120 N 1
SFX 2120 0 sindeyim .

SFX 2121 N 1
SFX 2121 0 ınızdaydım .

SFX 2122 N 1
SFX 2122 0 müzdür .

SFX 2123 N 1
SFX 2123 0 südür .

SFX 2124 N 1
SFX 2124 0 süydü .

SFX 2125 N 1
SFX 2125 0 'dasın .

SFX 2126 N 1
SFX 2126 0 'daydım .

SFX 2127 N 1
SFX 2127 0 'daydın .

SFX 2128 N 1
SFX 2128 0 'daymış .

SFX 2129 N 1
SFX 2129 0 'daysan .

SFX 2130 N 1
SFX 2130 0 ınkiler .

SFX 2131 N 1
SFX 2131 0 ınkilerle .

SFX 2132 N 1
SFX 2132 0 ınkinin .

SFX 2133 N 1
SFX 2133 0 deydiler .

SFX 2134 N 1
SFX 2134 0 suydum .

SFX 2135 N 1
SFX 2135 0 suysan .

SFX 2136 N 1
SFX 2136 0 suyum .

SFX 2137 N 1
SFX 2137 0 inkiyle .

SFX 2138 N 1
SFX 2138 0 immiş .

SFX 2139 N 1
SFX 2139 0 inizdir .

SFX 2140 N 1
SFX 2140 0 lerininkiyle .

SFX 2141 N 1
SFX 2141 0 lerleri .

SFX 2142 N 1
SFX 2142 0 'dur .

SFX 2143 N 1
SFX 2143 0 'muzun .

SFX 2144 N 1
SFX 2144 0 'sunda .

SFX 2145 N 1
SFX 2145 0 'yum .

SFX 2146 N 1
SFX 2146 0 lerleydim .
