dictionaries/tr/index.dic
alışkanlık/14,15,22,23,24,25,26,27,28,29,48,49,50,52,59,74,91,92,121,122,123,124,125,128,141,163,178,223,224,428,430,431,432,433,434,435,436,437,438,439,440,441,442,524,576,577,578,582,593,796,799,801,802,803,804,831,877,1395,1432,1957
asır/13,14,15,20,21,22,23,24,25,26,27,28,29,48,49,50,51,59,121,122,124,125,128,224,427,486,487,524,785,796,828,933,934,941,1956
ı/2033
katlanıl/71,74,75,76,77,84,93,94,102,114,126,138,170,558,1931
kıska/16,53,57,66,67,68,97,98,103,104,1958,1959,1960,1963,2328,2340,2341,2751,3941,3942,5575
kıskan/58,60,71,72,75,76,77,78,79,80,84,85,86,87,88,93,101,102,113,114,116,138,155,156,157,158,161,162,165,167,170,172,173,187,194,195,558,559,560,562,564,623,624,725,907,909,1391,1974
kızdır/11,58,60,61,71,72,74,75,76,77,78,79,80,81,84,85,86,87,88,93,94,99,101,102,113,114,116,126,127,129,130,138,141,152,155,156,158,159,160,161,162,165,166,170,172,173,174,175,176,187,192,195,207,208,557,558,559,560,624,632,779,894,907,908,1954
komuta/12,13,14,16,17,18,19,20,21,23,26,29,49,50,53,54,55,57,64,65,66,68,70,89,90,97,98,103,104,125,128,131,132,133,134,144,146,153,154,184,185,186,191,224,446,447,452,464,465,488,489,586,815,859,985,1093,1130,1365,1367,1380,1521,1958,1962,1964,2350,2354,2554,2790,3629
konumlandırıl/71,74,75,77,79,84,93,102,114,126,172,174,558,908,1951
nitelik/34,35,36,37,38,39,41,42,43,252,253,254,255,256,283,287,288,318,319,326,327,328,329,332,333,334,335,336,338,339,340,363,365,366,367,368,371,373,374,381,382,420,712,713,1164,1170,1190,1237,1265,1266,1269,1358,1426,1673,1892,1967,2877,3027,3886,4103,4638,5303
oynaş/11,15,22,52,60,61,71,74,75,76,77,78,82,84,85,87,88,91,113,114,135,156,163,166,170,195,211,212,231,511,559,723,786,787,864,865,1408,1969,1973
sallan/11,58,61,71,72,74,75,76,77,78,79,81,84,85,86,87,88,93,94,99,101,102,113,114,126,127,129,138,141,155,156,157,161,162,165,166,170,172,174,195,557,558,560,563,564,622,623,811,907,908,911,1392,1408,1409,1953
sarış/14,23,61,82,92,135,151,232,321,521,522,591,632,886,897,903,1204,1217,1218,1222,1429,1925,1927,1935,1949,1950,2076,2132,2388,2649
sulta/12,14,16,17,18,19,23,25,26,49,53,57,64,65,66,70,90,97,103,104,125,131,132,133,134,143,144,146,184,464,465,488,586,815,859,1093,1129,1366,1594,1784,1962,1963,2101,2102,2341,2689,2790,3630,4042,6197
süpermarket/33,34,35,36,37,38,39,41,42,43,252,253,255,256,261,263,267,270,272,273,274,275,276,277,283,287,288,333,335,339,373,539,654,655,970,1117,1184,1254,1265,1966,1967,3786
şa/12,13,16,17,18,19,20,21,51,53,54,55,56,57,64,65,66,70,90,97,103,104,146,153,186,446,447,448,449,450,459,461,462,464,859,929,992,993,995,1093,1563,1567,1569,1570,1571,1573,1574,1576,1784,1962,1963,1965,2094,2290,2749,2790,2930,4313,6255
tartışıl/11,71,72,74,75,76,77,78,79,84,85,86,88,93,94,102,114,118,126,129,130,138,141,142,155,156,170,176,557,558,559,569,622,723,724,821,908,910,1931,1932,2191
unutulmaz/14,15,20,22,23,25,26,27,28,29,50,51,61,82,121,123,125,135,180,231,234,430,439,522,575,580,892,1061,1955
yal/11,14,20,22,23,24,25,28,29,49,51,61,74,82,118,121,125,128,129,135,151,164,175,216,231,232,234,321,322,521,522,591,632,633,880,881,882,883,884,886,887,891,892,895,897,934,1003,1008,1021,1034,1204,1217,1218,1222,1429,1926,1935,5108
yapıl/11,58,60,61,71,72,74,75,76,77,78,79,84,85,86,87,88,93,94,99,102,113,114,126,127,129,130,138,141,142,152,157,158,161,162,166,170,171,172,174,175,176,187,192,195,205,208,209,220,511,555,557,558,559,568,569,600,622,623,624,723,724,908,909,910,912,1659,1920,1934,2196
yaptırt/58,60,71,74,75,79,85,86,87,88,93,99,102,113,114,118,142,155,156,163,170,207,208,210,211,212,214,561,624,729,1971
yaygı/12,13,14,16,18,19,23,26,27,53,57,65,66,70,90,97,103,125,128,131,184,586,859,1961,2554,2790
Yengeç/1977
yoksu/14,15,23,27,29,49,53,57,64,65,103,516,662,1434,1438,1632,1633,1963,1964,2340,2453,2478,2554,2770,2771,2772,3372,3690,4223,4224,4229,5770
zarf/11,14,15,22,23,24,25,26,27,28,29,48,49,50,52,61,82,91,92,121,122,123,125,128,135,151,163,178,224,231,232,321,428,433,439,442,521,522,524,591,632,796,881,883,886,889,897,955,1926
